Hawaii statutes.
§432:2-403 Benefits not attachable. No
money or other benefit, charity, relief or aid to be paid, provided or rendered
by a society, shall be liable to attachment, garnishment or other process, or
to be seized, taken, appropriated or applied by any legal or equitable process
or operation of law to pay any debt or liability of a member or beneficiary, or
any other person who may have a right thereunder, either before or after
payment by the society. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next